Hawaii statutes.
§412:2-611 Action to recover administrative
fines; deposit to compliance resolution fund. (a) If any Hawaii financial
institution, institution-affiliated party, or other person fails to pay an
assessment after any administrative fine assessed under this chapter has become
final, the commissioner shall recover the amount assessed by action in circuit
court, in which case the commissioner may request the court to award reasonable
attorney's fees and costs.

(b) All administrative fines collected under
authority of this chapter shall be deposited in the compliance resolution fund
established under section 26‑9(o). [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1; am L 1996, c
207, §5; am L 1998, c 196, §10; am L 1999, c 129, §10]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next